test/src/morphology/N-Ж_Д-душа_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - душа M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: душа́
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ду́шу
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: души́
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: душе́
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: душе́
      душа+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: душо́й
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ду́ши
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ду́ши
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: ду́ш
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: ду́шах
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: ду́шам
      душа+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: ду́шами
